Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3542
Geologist-intern; enrollment; eligibility; application.

(1) The board shall consider the following as evidence that an applicant is eligible for enrollment as a geologist-intern:

(a) The applicant has graduated from a geology or geologic specialty program that includes course work in geology that includes course work in the content domains and hours as prescribed by the board;

(b) The applicant has passed the examination on the fundamentals of geology; and

(c) The applicant has submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board.

(2)(a) Any individual may apply for enrollment as a geologist-intern prior to completing the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(b) The board may enroll any individual described in subdivision (a) of this subsection as a geologist-intern once the individual has completed the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(c) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that specify when an individual may apply for enrollment as a geologist-intern.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 32.